Wisconsin, session 2025, SB335.
do enact as follows:SB335,11Section 1. 14.837 of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,5214.837 Cosmetology licensure compact. There is created a cosmetology 1licensure compact commission as specified in s. 454.50. The delegate on the 2commission representing this state shall be appointed by the cosmetology 3examining board as provided in s. 454.50 (9) (b) 1. and shall be an individual 4described in s. 454.50 (9) (b) 2. The commission has the powers and duties granted 5and imposed under s. 454.50.SB335,26Section 2. 440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,97440.03 (11m) (c) 2rm. The coordinated database and reporting system under 8s. 454.50 (10), if such disclosure is required under the cosmetology licensure 9compact under s. 454.50.SB335,310Section 3. 454.01 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,1311454.01 (4) “Authorization to practice” means the authorization to practice, as 12defined in s. 454.50 (2) (c), of an individual in this state under a multistate license 13granted by another state that is a party to the compact.SB335,414Section 4. 454.01 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,1615454.01 (6) “Compact” means the cosmetology licensure compact under s. 16454.50.SB335,517Section 5. 454.01 (14g) of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,1818454.01 (14g) “Multistate license” has the meaning given in s. 454.50 (2) (u).SB335,619Section 6. 454.01 (14r) of the statutes is created to read:SB335,3,2220454.01 (14r) “Single-state license” means a single-state license, as defined in 21s. 454.50 (2) (x), to practice cosmetology granted by the examining board under s. 22454.06 (2) or 454.13.SB335,71Section 7. 454.04 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 454.04 (1) (a) (intro.) 2and amended to read:SB335,4,53454.04 (1) (a) (intro.) Except as permitted under pars. (b) and (d), sub. (1m), 4and subch. II, no person may engage in cosmetology unless the any of the following 5applies:SB335,4,861. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 7a current cosmetologist license issued by the examining board that is not an 8inactive license or.SB335,4,1093. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 10a temporary permit issued by the examining board or.SB335,4,11114. The person is an apprentice under s. 454.10 or.SB335,4,12125. The person is a student in a cosmetology course of instruction.SB335,813Section 8. 454.04 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB335,4,1614454.04 (1) (a) 2. The person has received training in the areas of service 15provided and holds a multistate license granted in another state that is a party to 16the compact.SB335,917Section 9. 454.04 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 454.04 (1) (b) (intro.) 18and amended to read:SB335,4,2019454.04 (1) (b) (intro.) No person may engage in aesthetics unless the any of the 20following applies:SB335,4,23211. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 22a current aesthetician license or cosmetologist license issued by the examining 23board that is not an inactive license or.SB335,5,213. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 2a temporary permit or training permit issued by the examining board or.SB335,5,334. The person is an apprentice under s. 454.10 or.SB335,5,545. The person is a student in an aesthetics or cosmetology course of 5instruction.SB335,106Section 10. 454.04 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB335,5,97454.04 (1) (b) 2. The person has received training in the areas of service 8provided and holds a multistate license granted in another state that is a party to 9the compact.SB335,1110Section 11. 454.04 (1) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 454.04 (1) (d) (intro.) 11and amended to read:SB335,5,1312454.04 (1) (d) (intro.) No person may engage in manicuring unless the any of 13the following applies:SB335,5,16141. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 15a current manicurist license or cosmetologist license issued by the examining board 16that is not an inactive license or.SB335,5,18173. The person has received training in the areas of service provided and holds 18a temporary permit or training permit issued by the examining board or.SB335,5,19194. The person is an apprentice under s. 454.10 or.SB335,5,21205. The person is a student in a manicuring or cosmetology course of 21instruction.SB335,1222Section 12. 454.04 (1) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB335,6,223454.04 (1) (d) 2. The person has received training in the areas of service 1provided and holds a multistate license granted in another state that is a party to 2the compact.SB335,133Section 13. 454.04 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB335,6,74454.04 (2) (a) No person may use the title “cosmetologist” or any other similar 5title unless the person holds a current cosmetologist license issued by the 6examining board that is not an inactive license or holds a multistate license granted 7in another state that is a party to the compact.SB335,148Section 14. 454.04 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb335 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb335 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB335 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB335 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB335: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting